California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

41811.

Within 120 days of receipt of the notice of deficiency issued pursuant to Section 41810, the city or county shall correct the deficiencies, readopt, and resubmit the city source reduction and recycling element or the countywide integrated waste management plan to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41811.5.

(a) If the board disapproves an element for which a city, county, or regional agency has received a notification of excluded wastes pursuant to Section 41801.5, the city, county, or regional agency may, concurrent with the procedures specified in Section 41811, submit additional information to substantiate that the requirements of Section 41781.2 have been met. The additional information shall be submitted to the board within 60 days of disapproval of the element.

(b) Following the receipt of additional information pursuant to subdivision (a) the board shall determine, within 60 days, whether all, or a portion of, the excluded waste will be included in the source reduction and recycling element for purposes of calculating compliance with Section 41780.

(c) Based upon the board’s determination pursuant to subdivision (b), the city, county, or regional agency shall revise its source reduction and recycling element to correct any deficiencies resulting from the exclusion of wastes pursuant to Section 41781.2, and shall resubmit the element to the board. The element shall be resubmitted within 120 days of a board determination pursuant to subdivision (b). Notwithstanding Section 41811, if an element is disapproved pursuant to Section 41800, and the notice of deficiency issued pursuant to Section 41810 identifies reasons for disapproval, including, but not limited to, noncompliance with Section 41781.2, the city, county, or regional agency shall correct all deficiencies, and readopt and resubmit the element to the board pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(d) In revising the source reduction and recycling element to address deficiencies arising from noncompliance with Section 41781.2, a city, county, or regional agency may limit the revisions to an identification and description of the specific measures that will be undertaken to achieve compliance with Section 41780.

(e) If a city, county, or regional agency is unable to resubmit the source reduction and recycling element within 120 days, the board may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the deadline imposed by subdivision (c) for submittal of a revised element.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41812.

If the board determines that the revised city, county, or regional agency source reduction and recycling element or the countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan submitted pursuant to Section 41811 or 41811.5 still fails to meet the requirements of this part, the board shall conduct a public hearing for the purpose of hearing testimony on the plan or element and the deficiencies identified by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41813.

(a) After conducting a public hearing pursuant to Section 41812, the board may impose administrative civil penalties of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day on any city or county, or, pursuant to Section 40974, on any city or county as a member of a regional agency, which fails to submit an adequate element or plan in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) The board shall not impose any penalty against a city or county pursuant to this section if the city or county is in substantial compliance with this part and if those aspects of a plan or element of a plan submitted by a city, county, or regional agency which is not in compliance with this part do not directly or substantially affect achievement of the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(c) In determining whether a city, county, or regional agency is in substantial compliance, the board shall consider whether the city, county, or regional agency has made a good faith effort to implement all reasonable and feasible measures to comply.

(d) The board shall not use the money collected from the penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for administrative purposes. The board shall use the money collected from the penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), to the extent possible, to assist local governments in meeting the requirements of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Provisions [41820.5. - 41822.]

41820.5.

(a) In addition to its authority under Section 41820, the board may, after a public hearing, grant a time extension from the diversion requirements of Section 41780 to a city if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The city was incorporated pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code after January 1, 1990, and before January 1, 2001.

(2) The county within which the city is located did not include provisions in its franchises that ensured that the now incorporated area would comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(b) The board may authorize a city that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) to submit a source reduction and recycling element that includes an implementation schedule that shows both of the following:

(1) The city shall divert 25 percent of its estimated generation amount of solid waste from landfill or transformation facilities within three years from the date on which the source reduction and recycling element is due pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41791.5, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(2) The city shall divert 50 percent of its estimated generation amount of solid waste from landfill or transformation facilities within eight years from the date on which the source reduction and recycling element is due pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41791.5, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41820.6.

(a) In addition to its authority under Section 41820, the board may, after a public hearing, grant a time extension from the requirements of Section 41780 to a city if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The city was incorporated pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 2001.

(2) The county within which the city is located did not include provisions in its franchises that ensured that the now incorporated area would comply with the requirements of Section 41780.

(b) The board may authorize a city that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) to submit a source reduction and recycling element that includes an implementation schedule that shows that the city shall comply with the requirements of Section 41780, within three years from the date on which the source reduction and recycling element is due pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41791.5, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 343, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.

(a) (1) Each year following the department’s approval of a jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element, household hazardous waste element, and nondisposal facility element, the jurisdiction shall submit a report to the department summarizing the jurisdiction’s progress in reducing solid waste as required by Section 41780, in accordance with the schedule set forth in this subdivision.

(2) The annual report shall be due on or before August 1 of the year following department approval of the source reduction and recycling element, the household hazardous waste element, and the nondisposal facility element, and on or before
 August 1 in each subsequent year. The information in this report shall encompass the previous calendar year, January 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(b) Each jurisdiction’s annual report to the department shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) Calculations of annual disposal reduction.

(2) A summary of progress made in implementing the source reduction and recycling element and the household hazardous waste element.

(3) An update of the jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element and household hazardous waste element that includes any new or expanded programs the jurisdiction has implemented or plans to implement.

(4) An update of the jurisdiction’s nondisposal facility element that reflects any new or expanded nondisposal facilities the jurisdiction is using or planning to use.

(5) A summary of progress made in diversion of construction and demolition of waste material, including information on programs and ordinances implemented by the local government and quantitative data, where available.

(6) Other information relevant to compliance with Section 41780.

(c) A jurisdiction may also include, in the report required by this section, all of the following:

(1) Information on disposal reported pursuant to
 Section 41821.5 that the jurisdiction believes may be relevant to the department’s determination of the jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate.

(2) Disposal characterization studies or other completed studies that show the effectiveness of the programs being implemented.

(3) Factors that the jurisdiction believes would affect the accuracy of, or mitigate the amount of, solid waste disposed by the jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(A) Whether the jurisdiction hosts a solid waste facility or regional diversion facility.

(B) The effects of self-hauled waste and construction and demolition waste.

(4) The extent to which the jurisdiction previously relied on biomass diversion credit and the extent to which it may be impacted by the lack of the credit.

(5) Information regarding the programs the jurisdiction is undertaking to address specific disposal challenges, and why it is not feasible to implement programs to respond to other factors that affect the amount of waste that is disposed.

(6) Other information that describes the good faith efforts of the jurisdiction to comply with Section 41780.

(d) The department shall use, but is not limited to the use of, the annual report to determine whether the jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element
 needs to be revised or updated.

(e) (1) The department shall adopt procedures for requiring additional information in a jurisdiction’s annual report. The procedures shall require the department to notify a jurisdiction of any additional required information no later than 120 days after the department receives the report from the jurisdiction.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not prohibit the department from making additional requests for information in a timely manner. A jurisdiction receiving a request for information shall respond in a timely manner.

(3) If the schedule for the submission of an annual report by a jurisdiction does not correspond with the scheduled review by the department
 specified in subdivision (a) of Section 41825, the department shall utilize the information contained in the annual report to assist the department in providing technical assistance and reviewing the jurisdiction’s diversion program implementation.

(f) The department shall adopt procedures for conferring with a jurisdiction regarding the implementation of its diversion programs.

(g) Notwithstanding the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act
 (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), a jurisdiction shall submit the progress report required by this section to the department electronically, using the department’s electronic reporting format system.

(h) Notwithstanding the reporting schedule required by this section, and in addition to the review required by Section 41825, the department may visit each jurisdiction once each year, but shall visit each jurisdiction no less than once
 every four years, to monitor the jurisdiction’s implementation and maintenance of its diversion programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 73.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.1.

(a) Each year following the board’s approval of a county or regional agency’s siting element and summary plan, the county or regional agency shall submit a report to the board summarizing the adequacy of the siting element and summary plan. The report on the siting element shall discuss any changes in disposal capacity, disposal facilities, or any other relevant issues. The annual report shall be due on or before August 1 of the year following board approval of a county or regional agency’s siting element and summary plan, and on or before August 1 in each subsequent year. The information in this report shall encompass the previous calendar year, January 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(b) The board shall adopt procedures that may authorize a jurisdiction to submit an abbreviated version of the report required pursuant to this section, if the board determines that the jurisdiction has met or exceeded the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780 for the previous two years, and if the board determines that the jurisdiction has otherwise complied with this division for the previous five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 740, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.2.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “district” means a community services district, public utility district, or sanitary district that provides solid waste handling services or implements source reduction and recycling programs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, each district shall do all of the following:

(1) Comply with the source reduction and recycling element and the household hazardous waste element of the city, county, or regional agency in which the district is located, as required by the city, county, or regional agency. The city, county, or regional agency shall notify a district of any program that it is implementing or modifying when it annually submits a report to the board pursuant to Section 41821.

(2) Provide each city, county, or regional agency in which it is located, information on the programs implemented by the district, the amount of waste disposed and reported to the disposal tracking system pursuant to Section 41821.5 for each city, county, or regional agency, and the amount of waste diverted by the district for each city, county, or regional agency.

(c) The board may adopt regulations pertaining to the format of the information to be provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and deadlines for supplying this information to the city, county, or regional agency, so that it may be incorporated into the annual report submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41821.

(d) A district is subject to the portion of a penalty imposed, pursuant to Section 41850, upon a city, county, or regional agency in which the district is located, that is in proportion to the district’s responsibility for failure to implement that jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element and household hazardous waste element, as determined by that city, county, or regional agency. The board shall not determine the proportion of a district’s responsibility as part of its determination to impose penalties. The city, county, or regional agency shall provide the district with a written notice regarding the district’s responsibility, including the basis for determining the district’s proportional responsibility, and an opportunity for hearing before the city, county, or regional agency’s governing body, before assessing the district a proportion of the penalty imposed by the board.

(e) A district may impose a fee in an amount sufficient to pay for the costs of complying with this section. The fees shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as the fees imposed pursuant to Sections 41901 and 41902.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 8.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.3.

(a) For the purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Inert waste” means only rock, concrete, brick, sand, soil, ceramics, and cured asphalt. “Inert waste” does not include any waste that meets the definition of “designated waste,” as defined in Section 13173 of the Water Code, or “hazardous waste” as defined in Section 40141.

(2) “Inert waste removed from the solid waste stream and not disposed of in a solid waste landfill” means the use or placement of inert waste on property where surface mining operations, as defined in Section 2735, are being conducted, or have been conducted previously, if the use or placement is for purposes of reclamation, as defined in Section 2733, pursuant to either of the following:

(A) A reclamation plan approved under Section 2774.

(B) For surface mining operations conducted prior to January 1, 1976, an agreement with a city or county, or a permit issued by a city or county, that provides for a fill appropriately engineered for the planned future use of the reclaimed mine site.

(3) “Jurisdiction” means a city, county, or regional agency.

(b) A jurisdiction shall deduct, from the amount of disposed waste that is required to be included in the annual report submitted to the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41821, inert waste removed from the solid waste stream and not disposed of in a solid waste landfill, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). A jurisdiction shall deduct this inert waste only in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, commencing with the report submitted by the jurisdiction to the board for the year 2001.

(c) (1) A jurisdiction shall deduct inert waste pursuant to subdivision (b) from its reported disposal tonnage for the year 2001, and shall identify, in the jurisdiction’s annual report, that the deduction is being made pursuant to this section and the exact amount of the deduction.

(2) The board shall verify that the deduction made pursuant to paragraph (1) is consistent with the requirements of this section and the amount deducted is consistent with the amount reported through the board’s disposal reporting system. The board shall approve the deduction made by the jurisdiction upon making this verification.

(3) If the board finds that the amount deducted pursuant to paragraph (1) does not meet the requirements of this section, or if the amount deducted is not consistent with the amount reported through the board’s disposal reporting system, the board shall notify the jurisdiction of its preliminary determination and confer with representatives of the jurisdiction to reach an agreement regarding the amount of the deduction. If the jurisdiction agrees upon the amount of the deduction, the board shall approve the deduction as modified. If the board and the jurisdiction are unable to reach agreement upon the amount of the deduction, the jurisdiction may request a hearing before the board to obtain a final determination.

(d) (1) A jurisdiction shall deduct tonnage from its base-year disposal in an amount equal to the amount deducted from the jurisdiction’s 2001 disposal tonnage pursuant to this section. The jurisdiction shall not deduct an amount from its base-year disposal tonnage that is greater than the amount of disposed inert waste that was included in its most recent board-approved revised base-year approved by the board.

(2) The board shall verify that the base-year deduction made pursuant to paragraph (1) is consistent with the requirements of this section. The board shall approve the revised base-year disposal tonnage upon making this verification.

(3) If the board finds that the base-year deduction requested pursuant to paragraph (1) is not consistent with the requirements of this section, the board shall notify the jurisdiction of its preliminary determination and confer with representatives of the jurisdiction in order to reach agreement regarding the amount of the deduction. If the jurisdiction agrees upon the amount of the deduction, the board shall approve the revised base-year disposal tonnage accordingly. If the board and the jurisdiction are unable to reach agreement upon the amount of the deduction, the jurisdiction may request a hearing before the board to obtain a final determination.

(e) (1) A jurisdiction shall deduct all inert waste from its reported disposal tonnage in all of its annual reports for all subsequent years. The board shall verify this deduction pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c).

(2) If the board approves the jurisdiction’s revised base-year disposal tonnage pursuant to subdivision (d), the revised base year disposal tonnage shall not be subsequently revised for inert waste under this section.

(f) This section does not limit the authority of the board to require any facility that uses or places inert material on property where surface mining operations are being conducted, or have been conducted previously, to report to the board on the quantities of inert material used or placed on the property for the purpose of reclamation.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that a city, county, or regional agency not be required to revise its source reduction and recycling element to comply with this section unless the city, county, or regional agency elects to implement this section as authorized by this section.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on the operative date of any regulation adopted by the board relating to “inert waste removed from the solid waste stream and not disposed of in a solid waste landfill,” as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), if that regulation includes procedures to facilitate the counting of the inert waste for purposes of the disposal reporting system established under Section 41821.5 when that inert waste is placed in a mine reclamation facility as fill material, and, as of January 1 immediately following that operative date, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before that January 1 deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 993, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Conditionally inoperative and repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.4.

(a) Commencing August 1, 2017, a county or regional agency shall include, in the annual report required pursuant to Section 41821, the following information:

(1) An estimate of the amount of organic waste in cubic yards that will be generated in the county or region over a 15-year period.

(2) An estimate of the additional organic waste recycling facility capacity in cubic yards that will be needed to process the amount of organic waste identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Areas identified by the county or regional agency as locations for new or expanded organic waste recycling facilities capable of safely
 meeting the additional organic waste recycling facility capacity need identified pursuant to paragraph (2).

(b) To provide the information pursuant to subdivision (a), the county or regional agency may use existing data regarding its diversion programs and is not required to perform additional waste characterization studies.

(c) For purposes of this section, “organic waste recycling facility” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42649.82.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.5.

(a) Disposal facility operators shall submit information on the disposal tonnages by jurisdiction or region of origin that are disposed of at each disposal facility to the department, and to counties that request the information, in a form prescribed by the department. To enable disposal facility operators to provide that information, solid waste handlers and transfer station operators shall provide information to disposal facility operators on the origin of the solid waste that they deliver to the disposal facility.

(b) (1) Recycling and composting operations and facilities shall submit periodic information to the department on the types and quantities of materials that are disposed of, sold, or transferred to other recycling or composting
 facilities, end users inside of the state or outside of the state, or exporters, brokers, or transporters for sale inside of the state or outside of the state.

(2) Exporters, brokers, self-haulers, and transporters of recyclables or compost shall submit periodic information to the department on the types, quantities, and destinations of materials that are disposed of, sold, or transferred. The department shall develop regulations implementing this section that define “self-hauler” to include, at a minimum, a person or entity that generates and transports, utilizing its own employees and equipment, more than one cubic yard per week of its own food waste to a location or facility that is not owned and operated by that person or entity.

(3) The information in the reports submitted pursuant to this subdivision may be provided to the department on an aggregated facilitywide basis and
 may exclude financial data, such as contract terms and conditions (including information on pricing, credit terms, volume discounts, and other proprietary business terms), the jurisdiction of the origin of the materials, or information on the entities from which the materials are received. The department may provide this information to jurisdictions, aggregated by company, upon request. The aggregated information, other than that aggregated by company, is public information.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the information in the report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include the jurisdiction or region of origin for exported materials that are a mixture of plastic wastes. This subparagraph does not apply to plastic waste consisting of only plastic resin 1, 2, or 5, as assigned to resin types under Section 18015, or a mixture of plastic waste consisting only of a combination of those resins.

(B) The department shall make publicly available information on the jurisdiction or region of origin and tonnage information for exported materials that are a mixture of plastic wastes.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “export” has the same definition as set forth in Section 41781.4.

(5) The reporting requirements imposed pursuant to this section do not apply to materials that are used by facilities defined as end users pursuant to the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section or that are otherwise exempt pursuant to those regulations. 

(c) The department shall adopt regulations pursuant to this section requiring practices and procedures that are reasonable and necessary to implement this section, and that
 provide a representative accounting of solid wastes and recyclable materials that are handled, processed, or disposed. Those regulations approved by the department shall not impose an unreasonable burden on waste and recycling handling, processing, or disposal operations or otherwise interfere with the safe handling, processing, and disposal of solid waste and recyclables. The department shall include in those regulations both of the following:

(1) Procedures to ensure that an opportunity to comply is provided prior to initiation of enforcement authorized by Section 41821.7.

(2) Factors to be considered in determining penalty amounts that are similar to those provided in Section 45016.

(d) Any person who refuses or fails to submit information required by regulations adopted pursuant to this section is liable for a
 civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation of a separate provision or, for continuing violations, for each day that the violation continues.

(e) Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false report, or any person who refuses to permit the department or any of its representatives to make inspection or examination of records, or who fails to keep any records for the inspection of the department, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in the records for the purpose of falsifying the records as required by regulations adopted pursuant to this section, is liable for a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of a separate provision or, for continuing violations, for each day that the violation continues.

(f) Liability under this section may be imposed in a civil action, or liability may be imposed administratively pursuant to this article.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and Article 11 (commencing with Section 1060) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, all records that the facility or operator is reasonably required to keep to allow the department to verify information in, or verification of, the reports required pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) and implementing regulations shall be subject to inspection and copying by the department, but shall be confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) Notwithstanding Title 5 (commencing
 with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and Article 11 (commencing with Section 1060) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, an employee of a government entity may, at the permitted solid waste facility, inspect and copy records related to tonnage received at the facility on or after July 1, 2015, and originating within the government entity’s geographic jurisdiction. Those records shall be limited to weight tags that identify the hauler, vehicle, quantity, date, type, and origin of waste received at a permitted solid waste facility. Those records shall be available to those government entities for the purposes of subdivision (a) and as necessary to enforce the collection of local fees, but those records shall be confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Names of haulers using specific landfills shall not be disclosed by a government entity
 unless necessary as part of an administrative or judicial enforcement proceeding to fund local programs or enforce local franchises.

(3) A government entity may petition the superior court for injunctive or declaratory relief to enforce its authority under paragraph (2). The times for responsive pleadings and hearings in these proceedings shall be set by the judge of the court with the object of securing a decision as to these matters at the earliest possible time.

(4) For purposes of this section, a “government entity” is an entity identified in Section 40145 or an entity formed pursuant to Section 40976.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “disposal” and “disposal facility” have the same meanings as prescribed by Sections 40120.1 and 40121, respectively.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit or expand the authority of a government entity that may have been provided by this section and implementing regulations as they read on December 31, 2015.

(7) The records subject to inspection and copying by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) or by an employee of a government entity pursuant to paragraph (2) may be redacted by the operator before inspection to exclude confidential pricing information contained in the records, such as contract terms and conditions (including information on pricing, credit terms, volume discounts, and other proprietary business terms), if the redacted information is not information that is otherwise required to be reported to the department.

(h) Notwithstanding the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of
 the Civil Code), reports required by this section shall be submitted electronically, using an electronic reporting format system established by the department.

(i) All records provided in accordance with this section shall be subject to Section 40062.

(j) For the purposes of this section:

(1) Recycling operations and facilities are facilities that conduct recycling, as defined in Section 40180, except that recycling is not limited to the processing of materials that would otherwise become solid waste, but also includes processes applied to nonhazardous materials that have value principally as a feedstock for that processing, regardless of whether the materials have been discarded or constitute solid waste.

(2) Regardless of whether a recycling operation or facility is required to register and report pursuant to the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section, that recycling operation or facility is not a solid waste handler unless the operation or facility is, in fact, handling solid waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 75, Sec. 1.   (SB 54)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.6.

In order to ensure that records required pursuant to this article are properly maintained, in addition to inspecting all relevant records, the department may conduct audits, perform site inspections, observe facility operations, and otherwise investigate the recordkeeping and reporting of persons subject to the requirements of this article. Any records, reports, notes, studies, drawings, schematics, photographs, or trade secrets, as defined in Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, obtained, produced, or created by the department in connection with or arising from those audits, inspections, or observations are confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government
 Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 391.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.7.

(a) The department may issue an administrative complaint to any person on whom civil liability may be imposed pursuant to this article. The complaint shall allege the acts or failures to act that constitute the basis for liability and the amount of the proposed civil liability. The complaint shall be served by personal service or certified mail and shall inform the party so served that a hearing shall be conducted within 60 days after the party has been served, unless the party waives the right to a hearing.

(b) If the party waives the right to a hearing, the department shall issue an order setting liability in the amount proposed in the complaint unless the
 department and the party have entered into a settlement agreement, in which case the department shall issue an order setting liability in the amount specified in the settlement agreement. If the party has waived the right to a hearing or if the department and the party have entered into a settlement agreement, the order shall not be subject to review by any court or agency.

(c) Any hearing required under this section shall be conducted by an independent hearing officer according to the procedures specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except as otherwise specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 746, Sec. 4.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.8.

(a) Orders setting civil liability issued under this article shall become effective and final upon issuance thereof, and payment shall be made within 30 days of issuance. Copies of these orders shall be served by personal service or by certified mail upon the party served with the complaint and upon other persons who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy.

(b) Within 30 days after service of a copy of a decision, any person so served may file with the superior court a petition for writ of mandate for review of the decision. Any person who fails to file the petition within the 30-day period may not challenge the reasonableness or validity of a decision or order of
 the hearing officer in any judicial proceedings brought to enforce the decision or order or for other remedies.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure governs any proceedings conducted pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) This section does not prohibit the court from granting any appropriate relief within its jurisdiction.

(e) All penalties collected under this article shall be deposited in the Integrated Waste Management Account created pursuant to Section 48001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 746, Sec. 5.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41821.9.

To assist market development efforts by the department, local agencies, and the private sector, the department shall use existing data resources.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 41821.6 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 746, Sec. 2.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41822.

Each city, county, or regional agency shall review its source reduction and recycling element or the countywide integrated waste management plan at least once every five years to correct any deficiencies in the element or plan, to comply with the source reduction and recycling requirements established under Section 41780, and to revise the documents, as necessary, to comply with this part. Any revision made to an element or plan pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the board for review and approval or disapproval pursuant to the schedule established under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 13.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Review and Compliance Orders [41825. - 41825.]

41825.

(a) At least once every four years, the department shall review each jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element and household hazardous waste element for compliance with Section 41780.

(b) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), the department may review whether a jurisdiction is in compliance with Section 41780 in accordance with the requirements of this section at any time that the department receives information that indicates the jurisdiction may not be making a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element and household hazardous waste element.

(c) (1) Before issuing a compliance order pursuant to subdivision (d), the
 department shall confer with the jurisdiction regarding conditions relating to the proposed order of compliance, with a first meeting occurring not less than 60 days before issuing a notice of intent to issue an order of compliance.
